Massachusetts, session 194th, H2249.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 70. Any major construction project occurring in a municipality within 1,500 feet
of another municipalities’ border shall contain an area of land between the 2 municipalities to
provide for a buffer zone to prevent harm to a neighboring municipality from another
municipalities’ allowance of major construction. For the purposes of this section the term major
construction project shall mean any public or private construction totaling in excess of
$5,000,000, road or highway construction or erection of any bridge over navigable or tidal
waters.
of 2

The buffer zone shall include, but not be limited to: parks, gardens, trails, wetlands open
space, or a specific protected area, where restrictions on resource use and development measures
are undertaken in order to enhance the open space or conservation use of the protected area.
of 2